District of Columbia statutes.
26-211

Withdrawal by shareholder.

A shareholder shall be entitled to withdraw at any time, by giving such notice as the bylaws may require, where no advance has been made on his shares, in which case he shall be entitled to receive the amount of dues paid in by him on each of his shares, together with such proportion of the profits accrued or such rate of interest as said bylaws may determine, less all fines due and a proportionate part of all losses and other charges incurred; provided, that not more than one-half of the funds in the treasury at any time shall be applicable to the demands of the withdrawing shareholders without the consent of the board of trustees.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1300, ch. 854, § 696

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-511.
1973 Ed., § 26-410.